Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1260
Water skis, aquaplane, or similar device; manner of operation.

All motorboats having in tow or otherwise assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane, or similar contrivance, shall be operated in a careful and prudent manner and at a reasonable distance from persons and property so as not to endanger the life or property of any person.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 60.